Utah statutes.
38-1a-702.   Parties -- Consolidation of separate actions.

(1)  In an action under this part, subject to the time restrictions under Subsection 38-1a-701(2):

(a)  a claimant who is not contesting the claim of another claimant may join as a plaintiff;

(b)  a claimant who fails or refuses to become a plaintiff may be made a defendant; and

(c)  a claimant who is not made a party may intervene at any time before the final hearing.

(2)  If separate actions are commenced under this part to enforce preconstruction or construction liens on the same property, the court may consolidate the actions and make all claimants parties to the consolidated action.



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

